Utah statutes.
17B-1-1202.   Authority to file a validation petition -- Petition requirements -- Amending or supplementing a validation petition.

(1)  The board of trustees of a local district may at any time file a validation petition.

(2)  Each validation petition shall:

(a)  describe the eligible function for which a validation order is sought;

(b)  set forth:

(i)  the facts upon which the validity of the eligible function is founded; and

(ii)  any other information or allegations necessary to a determination of the validation petition;

(c)  be verified by the chair of the board of trustees; and

(d)  be filed in the district court of the county in which the district's principal office is located.

(3)  A local district may amend or supplement a validation petition:

(a)  at any time before the hearing under Section 17B-1-1203; or

(b)  after the hearing under Section 17B-1-1203, with permission of the court.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

